Illinois, session 104th, HB1906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-172.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172.1 new)7    Sec. 15-172.1. Senior Citizens Homestead Exemption School 8Levy Cap Law.9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Senior Citizens 10Homestead Exemption School Levy Cap Law. 11    (b) As used in this Section: 12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section. 14    "Base year" means the taxable year for which the applicant 15first qualifies and applies for the exemption, provided that, 16in the taxable year immediately preceding that taxable year, 17the property was improved with a permanent structure that was 18occupied as the primary residence by an applicant who was 19liable for paying real property taxes on the property and who 20was either (i) an owner of record of the property or had a 21legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 22written instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest 23as a lessee in the parcel of property that was a single-family   HB1906- 2 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1residence and that lease obligates the lessee to pay property 2taxes on the parcel. 3    "Base year applicable K-12 school salary levy" means the 4aggregate tax levy share applied to the property in the base 5year pursuant to Section 17-2 of the School Code that derives 6from: (i) faculty salaries and benefits; (ii) administrator 7salaries and benefits; and (iii) classified staff salaries and 8benefits. 9    "Chief county assessment officer" means the County 10Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 11the property is located. 12    "Consumer Price Index-u" means the index published by the 13Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 14Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 15services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 16average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 17    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value of the 18property as equalized by the Department of Revenue. 19    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 20applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 21applicant as their principal place of residence. 22    "Household income" means the combined income of the 23members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 24taxable year. 25    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 26of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property   HB1906- 3 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1Tax Relief Act, except that "income" does not include 2veteran's benefits.3    "Incremental K-12 school salary levy" means for any year 4after the base year, the aggregate tax levy share applied to 5the property pursuant to Section 17-2 that exceeds the base 6year applicable K-12 school salary levy and derives from: (i) 7faculty salaries and benefits; (ii) administrator salaries and 8benefits; and (iii) classified staff salaries and benefits.9    "Incremental K-12 school salary levy exemption amount" 10means the incremental K-12 school salary levy exemption 11calculated for that tax year. 12    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 13Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 14relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 15preceding the taxable year. 16    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 17a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 18Act. 19    "Maximum income limitation" means, for taxable year 2026, 20$100,000. "Maximum income limitation" means, for taxable year 212027 and each taxable year thereafter, the maximum income 22limitation for the immediately preceding taxable year, 23multiplied by one plus the lesser of (i) the percentage 24increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index-u during the 25immediately preceding taxable year or (ii) 2%. The product 26generated when determining the maximum income limitation for   HB1906- 4 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1taxable year 2027 and each taxable year thereafter shall be 2rounded to the nearest whole dollar. 3    "Qualified applicant" means a person who: 4        (1) is 65 years of age or older during the taxable 5    year;6        (2) has a household income that does not exceed the 7    maximum income limitation for the applicable taxable year;8        (3) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 9    property; and10        (4) is an owner of record of the property or has a 11    legal, equitable, or leasehold interest in the property, 12    as evidenced by a written instrument. 13    "Qualified property: means real property that is improved 14with a permanent structure and:15        (1) is not occupied as a permanent residence by a 16    person who is or will be enrolled in a school district that 17    is eligible to place a levy on the property pursuant to 18    Section 17-2 of the School Code; and19        (2) is occupied as a primary residence by a qualified 20    applicant.21    "Residence" means a principal dwelling place and 22appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 23State that is occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a 24household, and so much of the surrounding land constituting 25the parcel upon which the dwelling place is situated as is used 26for residential purposes. If the chief county assessment   HB1906- 5 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1officer has established a specific legal description for a 2portion of property constituting the residence, then that 3portion of property shall be deemed the residence for the 4purposes of this Section.5    "Retirement age base amount" means the base year equalized 6assessed value of a residence as of the year the first 7homeowner of the residence, who has resided in the residence 8as a primary residence for a period of at least 5 years, turns 9age 65. 10    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 11valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 12levied. 13    (c) Beginning in taxable year 2026, a senior citizens 14homestead school levy exemption is granted for qualified 15property. 16    (d) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 17amount of the exemption for all taxable years for qualifying 18property is the incremental K-12 school salary levy exemption 19amount, which may be reduced by an amount not to exceed the 20percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index-u for 21the immediately preceding taxable year. In all other counties, 22the amount of the exemption for qualifying residents is the 23Incremental K-12 school salary levy exemption amount, provided 24that the Incremental K-12 school salary levy exemption amount 25may be reduced by 1% per year, provided that the total 26Incremental K-12 school salary levy does not exceed 2% of the   HB1906- 6 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1fair market value of the property. 2    (e) If the applicant is the surviving spouse of a person 3who dies on or after January 1, 2026, and if the deceased 4spouse was a qualified applicant at the time of his or her 5death, then the exemption shall carry over to the benefit of 6the surviving spouse if (i) the surviving spouse meets the 7definition of a qualified applicant in the current taxable 8year, without regard to whether the surviving spouse has 9reached the age of 65, (ii) the surviving spouse continues to 10occupy the property as a primary residence in the current 11taxable year, and (iii) no individual residing at the real 12property is or will be enrolled in a school district that is 13eligible to place a levy on the property pursuant to Section 1417-2 of the School Code. 15    (f) Each year at the time the assessment books are 16certified to the county clerk, the board of review shall give 17to the county clerk a list of the assessed values of 18improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 19were added after the base year for this parcel and that 20increased the assessed value of the property. In the case of 21land improved with an apartment building owned and operated as 22a cooperative or a building that is a life care facility that 23qualifies as a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 24equalized assessed value of the property is limited to the sum 25of the reductions calculated for each unit that (i) is 26occupied as a residence by a qualified applicant or by the   HB1906- 7 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1surviving spouse of qualified applicant who is eligible for 2the exemption under this Section as provided in subsection (e) 3and (ii) is not occupied as a permanent residence by a person 4who is or will be enrolled in a school district that is 5eligible to place a levy on the property pursuant to Section 617-2 of the School Code. In the case of a cooperative where a 7homestead exemption has been granted under this Section, the 8cooperative association or its management firm shall credit 9the savings resulting from that exemption only to the 10apportioned tax liability of the owner who qualified for the 11exemption. Any person who willfully refuses to credit that 12savings to an owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty 13of a Class B misdemeanor. When a homestead exemption has been 14granted under this Section and an applicant then becomes a 15resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 16Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 17Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 18Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in 19subsequent years so long as the residence (i) continues to be 20occupied by the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if 21remaining unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified 22applicant for the homestead exemption, and no individual 23residing at the real property is or will be enrolled in a 24school district that is eligible to place a levy on the 25property pursuant to Section 17-2 of the School Code. 26    When married persons maintain separate residences, the   HB1906- 8 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 2one of such persons and for only one residence, and provided 3that no individual residing at the real property is or will be 4enrolled in a school district that is eligible to place a levy 5on the property pursuant to Section 17-2 of the School Code. 6For taxable year 2026, in counties having less than 3,000,000 7inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit 8an application by February 15, 2026 to the chief county 9assessment officer of the county in which the property is 10located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 11taxable year 2027 and all subsequent taxable years, to receive 12the exemption, a person may submit an application to the Chief 13County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 14is located during such period as may be specified by the Chief 15County Assessment officer. The Chief County Assessment Officer 16in counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants shall annually 17give notice of the application period by mail or by 18publication. In counties having less than 3,000,000 19inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 2027 and thereafter, 20a county may, by ordinance, establish a date for submission of 21applications that is different than February 15. The applicant 22shall submit with the application an affidavit of the 23applicant's total household income, age, marital status (and 24if married the name and address of the applicant's spouse, if 25known), confirmation that no individual residing at the real 26property is or will be enrolled in a tax levying body eligible   HB1906- 9 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1to place a levy on the property pursuant to Section 17-2 of the 2School Code for the full taxable year, and principal dwelling 3place of members of the household on January 1 of the taxable 4year. The Department shall establish, by rule, a method for 5verifying the accuracy of affidavits filed by applicants under 6this Section, and the chief county assessment officer may 7conduct audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under 8this Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to 9receive the exemption. Each application shall contain or be 10verified by a written declaration that it is made under the 11penalties of perjury. A taxpayer's signing a fraudulent 12application under this Act is perjury, as defined in Section 1332-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The applications shall be 14clearly marked as applications for the Senior Citizens 15Homestead Exemption School Levy Cap and must contain a notice 16that any taxpayer who receives the exemption is subject to an 17audit by the Chief County Assessment Officer. 18    Beginning January 1, 2027, notwithstanding any other 19provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 203,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 21application required by this Section in a timely manner and 22this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 23sufficiently severe to render the applicant incapable of 24filing the application in a timely manner, the chief county 25assessment officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 26of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this   HB1906- 10 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1paragraph, the applicant shall provide the chief county 2assessment officer with a signed statement from the 3applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 4physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 5condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 6registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 7condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 8incapable of filing the application in a timely manner. 9    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 10of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 11apply for the Senior Citizens Homestead Exemption School Levy 12Cap during that taxable year. Application shall be made during 13the application period in effect for the county of his or her 14residence. 15    The chief county assessment officer may determine the 16eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 17cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 18by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 19questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to ensure 20that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 21by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 22each qualifying resident. The chief county assessment officer 23may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 24credited that exemption. Except as provided in this Section, 25all information received by the chief county assessment 26officer or the Department from applications filed under this   HB1906- 11 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1Section, or from any investigation conducted under the 2provisions of this Section, shall be confidential, except for 3official purposes or pursuant to official procedures for 4collection of any State or local tax or enforcement of any 5civil or criminal penalty or sanction imposed by this Act or by 6any statute or ordinance imposing a State or local tax. Any 7person who divulges any such information in any manner, except 8in accordance with a proper judicial order, is guilty of a 9class A misdemeanor. Nothing contained in this Section shall 10prevent the Director or chief county assessment officer from 11publishing or making available reasonable statistics 12concerning the operation of the exemption contained in this 13Section in which the contents of claims are grouped into 14aggregates in such a way that information contained in any 15individual claim shall not be disclosed.16    (g) Each chief county assessment officer shall annually 17publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 18under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 19days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 20application must be submitted to the chief county assessment 21officer of the county in which the property is located. The 22notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 23the county. 24    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 25Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 26implementation of any mandate created by this Section.    HB1906- 12 -LRB104 07491 HLH 17534 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.